District of Columbia statutes.
4-210.14

Right to request hearing while absent from District.

A recipient shall have the same right to a hearing while absent from the District that he or she had while living in the District.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1014, 29 DCR 1060

History

1981 Ed., § 3-210.14.

Prior Codifications